Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1042.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Title 35, chapter 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 2.2, to read: ARTICLE 2.2. Arizona STRATEGIC digital asset RESERVE START_STATUTE35-331. Public monies; investment; virtual currency; reserves; definitions A. In addition to the investment authority in articles 2 and 2.1 of this chapter, a public fund may invest not more than ten percent of the public monies under its control in virtual currency holdings. B. If the United States secretary of the treasury establishes a strategic bitcoin reserve for the storage of government bitcoin holdings, a public fund may store the virtual currency holdings of the public fund in a secure SEGREGATED account within the strategic bitcoin reserve. C. for the purposes of this section: 1. "Public fund" means the state treasurer or a retirement system. 2. "Retirement system" means a retirement plan or system that is established by or pursuant to title 38. 3. "Virtual currency" means a digital representation of value that functions as a medium of exchange, a unit of account and a store of value and includes stablecoins. virtual currency does not include legal tender issued by the united states or a foreign government. 4. "stablecoin" means a payment stablecoin as defined in the guiding and establishing national innovation for U.s. stablecoins (genius) act of 2025 (p.l. 119-27) and that is issued in compliance with all applicable federal laws governing such issuance. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Arizona Strategic Digital Asset Reserve Act".